Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2704
Associate, defined.

Associate means a partner, a subsidiary, an affiliate, an agent, or any other person working in association with a foreclosure consultant or an equity purchaser. Associate does not include a person who is excluded from the definition of an equity purchaser or a foreclosure consultant.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 4.